Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2214
Rules and regulations; commissioner; powers.

The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Non-English-Speaking Workers Protection Act. The commissioner or a representative of the commissioner, including the coordinator, may:

(1) Inspect employment records of an employer relating to the total number of employees, the total number of non-English-speaking employees, and the services provided to non-English-speaking employees; and

(2) Interview an employer, any representative, any agent, or an employee of the employer during working hours or at other reasonable times.

Laws 1995, LB 20, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 48-2204;

Laws 2003, LB 418, § 8.